Missouri, session 2026, SB1197.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 226, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 226.1250, to read as
follows:
226.1250. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Alexander Whalen Safe Highways Act".
2. As used in this section, the term "wrong-way
vehicle detection system" or "WWVDS" means a system
consisting of equipment for wrong-way vehicle detection,
wrong-way and do not enter signs enhanced with light-
emitting diodes or similar enhanced visibility features, and
real-time alerts.
3. The department of transportation shall implement
WWVDSs beginning no later than March 1, 2027. The
department shall prioritize the installation of a WWVDS at
the intersection of westbound Interstate 64 and Jefferson
Avenue. The implementation of other WWVDSs will be upon
appropriation or upon approval from the director as needed.
4. The department shall evaluate the feasibility and
effectiveness of a system to notify other drivers in the
area about a wrong-way driver.
5. The department shall evaluate the feasibility and
effectiveness of a system to notify emergency responders of
a wrong-way driver.
1

6. Beginning December 31, 2027, and annually
thereafter, the department shall produce a report on the
implementation and effectiveness of WWVDSs, to include:
(1) The number and locations of systems currently
implemented;
(2) The number and locations of systems planned to be
implemented;
(3) The effect on wrong-way driving incidents and
fatalities;
(4) The cost-effectiveness of implemented systems; and
(5) Any adjustments to implementation strategies to be
made based on these or other factors.
2